Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.246

Removal of directors and supervisory committee members—Interim directors and supervisory committee members.

(1) The members of a credit union may remove a director of the credit union at a special membership meeting held in accordance with RCW 31.12.195 and called for that purpose. If the members remove a director, the members may at the same special membership meeting elect an interim director to complete the remainder of the former director's term of office or authorize the board to appoint an interim director as provided in RCW 31.12.225.

(2) The members of a credit union may remove a supervisory committee member at a special membership meeting held in accordance with RCW 31.12.195 and called for that purpose. If the members remove a supervisory committee member, the members may at the same special membership meeting elect an interim supervisory committee member to complete the remainder of the former supervisory committee member's term of office or authorize the supervisory committee to appoint an interim supervisory committee member as provided in RCW 31.12.326.

[ 2017 c 61 s 5; 1997 c 397 s 16; 1984 c 31 s 26.]